Massachusetts, session 194th, H3476.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 25A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
2 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
3  Section 25A. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the 
4 context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings: 
5  “Certified TAB Technician”, a person who is certified as a testing and balancing 
6 technician by one of the following: 
7  (1) Associated Air Balance Council (AABC); 
8  (2) National Environmental Balancing Bureau (NEBB); or 
9  (3) Testing Adjusting and Balancing Bureau (TABB). 

2 of 11 10  “Energy audit”, an investment-grade study of a school that yields recommendations on 
11 energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy systems to install on or nearly school 
12 properties. Energy audits shall estimate the costs, savings, and greenhouse gas reductions from 
13 implementing the recommendations and shall include a list of financing options, including 
14 federal, state, and local funding sources. Energy audits shall also include, but not be limited to, 
15 mechanical insulation evaluation and inspection of the building envelope(s). 
16  “Energy efficiency improvements”, any improvement, repair, alteration, or betterment of 
17 any building or facility, subject to all applicable building codes, owned or operated by a public 
18 institution of higher education, municipally-owned institution of higher education, and public 
19 elementary and secondary school or any equipment, fixture, or furnishing to be added to or used 
20 in any such building or facility that is designed to reduce energy consumption. Energy efficiency 
21 improvements include, but are not limited to: adding square footage to existing school facilities; 
22 building envelope improvements; heating, ventilating, and cooling upgrades; lighting retrofits; 
23 installing or upgrading an energy management system; motor, pump, or fan replacements; 
24 domestic water use reductions; information technology improvements associated with an energy 
25 conservation improvement to school facilities; mechanical insulation; municipal utility 
26 improvements associated with an energy conservation improvement to school facilities; and 
27 upgrading other energy consuming equipment or appliances. 
28  “Environmental justice communities”, a population with an annual median household 
29 income of not more than 65 per cent of the statewide median income or with a segment of the 
30 population that consists of not less than 25 per cent minority, foreign born, or lacking in English 
31 language proficiency based on the most recent United States census. 

3 of 11 32  “Historically marginalized communities”, a community that has historically suffered 
33 from discrimination and has not had equal access to public or private economic benefits due to 
34 the race, ethnicity, gender, geography, language preference, immigrant or citizen status, sexual 
35 orientation, gender identity, socioeconomic status, or disability status of its members. 
36  “Mechanical engineer”, a professional engineer registered as a mechanical engineer by 
37 the board of professional engineers and land surveyors, pursuant to section 81E of chapter 112, 
38 and who has professional experience with heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems. 
39  “Mechanical ventilation system”, a building ventilation system provided by mechanically 
40 powered, permanent equipment, such as motor-driven fans and blowers, and includes carbon 
41 dioxide monitoring. The term does not include devices such as wind-driven turbine ventilators, 
42 portable air cleaning and filtration devices, and mechanically operated windows. 
43  “Office”, the Healthy and Sustainable Schools Office. 
44  “Renewable energy systems”, energy generated from any source that qualifies as a Class 
45 1 or Class II renewable energy source under section 11F of chapter 25A. 
46  “School Building Authorities”, the Massachusetts School Building Authority, University 
47 of Massachusetts Building Authority, and Massachusetts State College Building Authority. 
48  “Skilled and trained construction workforce”, a workforce, compensated, at minimum, in 
49 conformance with section 26 through 27D, inclusive, of chapter 149, for the purposes of this act, 
50 in which at least 60% of the workers are graduates of or registered in and attending an 
51 apprenticeship program registered with a Bona Fide Apprenticeship Training Program 
52 (“BFATP”). A BFATP is one that is currently registered with and approved by the United States 

4 of 11 53 Department of Labor or a state apprenticeship agency and has graduated apprentices to 
54 journeyperson status for at least three of the past five years.  
55  “Qualified adjusting personnel”, means either of the following: 
56  (1) A certified TAB technician; or 
57  (2) A skilled and trained workforce under the supervision of a certified TAB 
58 technician. 
59  “Qualified testing personnel”, a certified TAB technician or a person certified to perform 
60 ventilation verification assessments of heating, ventilation, and air conditioning systems through 
61 a certification body accredited under the ISO/IEC 17024 Personnel Certification standard. 
62  (c) (1) In the Department of Energy Resources within the Executive Office of Energy and 
63 Environmental Affairs, there shall be a Healthy and Sustainable Schools Office. The office shall 
64 carry out its duties and responsibilities in coordination with the School Building Authorities.  
65  (2) The office shall have a director appointed by the governor; two members appointed 
66 by the senate president, one of whom shall be a representative of organized labor; two members 
67 appointed by the speaker of the house, one of whom shall be a representative of organized labor. 
68 The office shall employ architects, consulting engineers, attorneys, construction, financial and 
69 other experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be 
70 necessary in its judgment.  
71  (3) The office shall conduct energy audits at all public institutions of higher education, 
72 municipally-owned institutions of higher education, and public elementary and secondary 
73 schools. Energy audits shall be prioritized for public institutions of higher education, 

5 of 11 74 municipally-owned institutions of higher education, and public elementary and secondary 
75 schools located in environmental justice communities.  
76  (4) Energy audits shall include a ventilation verification assessment to be performed by 
77 qualified testing personnel and shall be conducted no less than every five years thereafter. 
78 Ventilation verification documentation shall be submitted to a mechanical engineer for the 
79 development of an assessment report. The ventilation verification assessment documentation for 
80 a heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system shall include: 
81   
82  (i) documentation of HVAC equipment and motor nameplate data; 
83  (ii) testing for maximum system capacity and airflow to determine the highest Minimum 
84 Efficiency Reporting Value (MERV) filtration that can be installed without adversely impacting 
85 equipment; 
86  (iii) physical measurements of outside air rate at minimum and maximum load 
87 conditions; 
88  (iv) for each zone, documentation of the estimated number of occupants and current 
89 occupancy categories as listed in the International Mechanical Code, Table 403.1.1, as adopted 
90 by the Commonwealth of Massachusetts; 
91  (v) measurement of all exhaust air volume for exhaust fans, including restrooms; 
92  (vi) verification of operation of ventilation components including economizers and 
93 demand control ventilation as applicable;  

6 of 11 94  (vii) measurement of all air distribution inlets and outlets; 
95  (viii) verification and documentation of building pressure, individual classroom pressure, 
96 and any rooms designed to be negative pressure spaces; 
97  (ix) verification of unit operation and that required maintenance has been performed in 
98 accordance with ASHRAE Standard 62.1-2022 Section 8 and Table 8-1. 
99  (x) verification of control sequences to verify systems operate continuously during 
100 occupied hours to maintain the intended filtration, ventilation, and temperature setpoints; and 
101  (xi) verification of existing carbon dioxide sensors or as an indicator of proper ventilation 
102 throughout the school year, all classrooms shall be equipped with a CO2 monitor that conforms 
103 to the recommendations of the University of California - Davis, Western Cooling and Efficiency 
104 Center white paper on Proposed Ventilation and Energy Efficiency Verification/Repair Program 
105 for School Reopening.  
106  A qualified testing personnel shall document the ventilation assessment and prepare an 
107 HVAC Assessment Report for review by a mechanical engineer. A mechanical engineer shall 
108 review the HVAC assessment report, verify or adjust the minimum outside air ventilation rates 
109 and determine what, if any, additional adjustments, repairs, upgrades, or replacements would be 
110 necessary to meet the minimum ventilation and filtration requirements of the local code authority 
111 and follow the criteria of the most recent edition of the Massachusetts Mechanical Code, and 
112 provide a cost estimate for all recommended work.  
113  The office shall require all school districts to make the appropriate corrective actions 
114 identified in the ventilation assessment report as reviewed by a mechanical engineer. The 

7 of 11 115 corrective actions shall include testing, adjusting, and balancing the public school mechanical 
116 ventilation system and, if necessary or cost effective, repairs, upgrades, or replacement of the 
117 existing heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system or the installation of a stand-alone 
118 mechanical ventilation system. The corrective actions identified in the ventilation assessment 
119 report may include general maintenance, reading and adjustment of ventilation rates, filter 
120 replacement to meet a Minimum Efficiency Reporting Value (MERV) of at least 13 if equipment 
121 allows, while assuring the pressure drop is less than the fan’s capability, direct outside airflow 
122 intake measurement, or whole system installation or replacement. Portable filtration and air 
123 cleaners shall be used only if the existing heating, ventilation and air conditioning infrastructure 
124 cannot meet minimum filtration and ventilation requirements or, as recommended by a 
125 mechanical engineer, as a supplemental enhancement to the permanent heating, ventilation, and 
126 air conditioning system or there are concerns with outdoor air contaminants such as those created 
127 by wildfires and pollution. All HVAC repairs, upgrades, or replacements shall be performed by a 
128 skilled and trained workforce. All HVAC adjustments shall be performed by qualified adjusting 
129 personnel. 
130  School districts shall ensure that all work required by the ventilation assessment is 
131 performed using a skilled and trained construction workforce and rules promulgated in 
132 accordance with this act. The office shall work in consultation with the department of labor 
133 standards to ensure that the assessments and construction required by this act meet all standards 
134 and requirements of the Massachusetts state building code. 
135  (5) The results of each energy audit shall be memorialized by the office and shall be 
136 provided to the applicable school and School Building Authorities. The office shall retain a copy 
137 of each energy audit and promptly make the results available for public inspection on its website. 

8 of 11 138 Any information sensitive to school safety and security shall be redacted before being made 
139 public.  
140  (6) The office shall facilitate implementing recommended energy efficiency 
141 improvements and installing renewable energy systems on or nearby school property. The office 
142 is authorized and encouraged to aggregate projects to maximize efficiency, including but not 
143 limited to, negotiating bulk purchases of renewable energy and energy efficiency equipment, 
144 energy audits, and installation services. The office shall prioritize installing energy efficiency 
145 improvements and renewable energy systems at schools located in environmental justice 
146 communities.  
147  (7) Third party contractors shall be prohibited from performing both energy audits and 
148 installing energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy systems at the same school.  
149  (8) The office shall seek public input from stakeholders, including but not limited to, 
150 school boards, labor union representatives, and community members when implementing 
151 recommended energy efficiency improvements and installing renewable energy systems.  
152  (9) The office is authorized to make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary 
153 or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this act.  
154  (10) The office shall ensure that contractors and subcontractors of all tiers engaging in the 
155 construction and installation of energy efficient improvements and renewable energy systems 
156 submit sworn certifications as part of the bidding process that the firm will: 
157  (i) provide documentation of its participation in a state or federally registered 
158 apprenticeship training program for each trade in which it employs craft workers; 

9 of 11 159  (ii) ensure that each employee on the project will be paid, at minimum, wages and 
160 benefits that are not less than the prevailing wage and fringe benefits rates as prescribed in 
161 sections 26 through 27D, inclusive, of chapter 149, for the corresponding classification in which 
162 the employee is employed; 
163  (iii) comply with the commonwealth’s public bidding laws, including section 39M of 
164 chapter 30, section 44A of chapter 149, and section 8 of chapter 149A, as applicable; 
165  (iv) comply with all other applicable federal, state, and local laws; 
166  (v) prioritize hiring residents from environmental justice communities and members of 
167 historically marginalized communities; 
168  (vi) comply with all state and local hiring goals for women, minorities, and veterans; 
169  (vii) provide documentation of its partnership(s) with high-quality pre-apprenticeship 
170 training programs; and 
171  (viii) become signatory to a project labor agreement if such an agreement is selected as 
172 the project delivery method for the construction by the contracting authority. 
173  A bid will not be considered complete and ready for review until all certifications have 
174 been submitted as part of its bid package. The failure to include complete and accurate 
175 certifications prior to the bid deadline shall be grounds for disqualification from the bidding 
176 process. 
177  (11) The office shall ensure that contractors and subcontractors of all tiers, as part of the 
178 bid process, disclose and certify the following: 

10 of 11 179  (i) contractors and subcontractors on the project are currently, and will remain, in 
180 compliance with chapters 149, 151, 151A, 151B, and 152 and 29 U.S.C. section 201, et seq. and 
181 federal anti-discrimination laws for the duration of the project;  
182  (ii) contractors and subcontractors on the project have complied with chapters 149, 151, 
183 151A, 151B, and 152 and 29 U.S.C. section 201, et seq. and federal anti-discrimination laws for 
184 the last three (3) calendar years; and  
185  (iii) when contractors or subcontractors on the project cannot meet the certification 
186 requirements provided for in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the contractors and 
187 subcontractors must submit proof of a wage bond or other comparable form of insurance in an 
188 amount equal to the aggregate of one year’s gross wages for all workers projected to be 
189 employed by the contractor or subcontractor for which certification is unavailable, to be 
190 maintained for the life of the project.  
191  (d) (1) The state shall appropriate funds to a revolving fund to finance activities 
192 authorized under this act including, but not limited to, providing energy audits and installing 
193 energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy systems on or nearby school property. 
194 The office shall be responsible for administering this fund. 
195  (2) The office shall apply for, receive, and accept funding from local and federal sources 
196 to carry out its duties, including but not limited to the following sources:  
197  (i) funding authorized under Pub. L. 117-58, including but not limited to funding 
198 programs under the Department of Energy’s State and Community Energy Program; 

11 of 11 199  (ii) funding authorized under Pub. L. 117-69, including but not limited to the Greenhouse 
200 Gas Reduction Fund;  
201  (iii) funding authorized under Pub. L. 117-2, including but not limited to funds for 
202 elementary and secondary emergency relief;  
203  (iv) state bonds; 
204  (v) funding from green banks; and 
205  (vi) department funding. 
206  SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on 1/1/2026.